Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-3416
Good ethical character, defined.

Good ethical character means such character as will enable a person to discharge the fiduciary duties of an architect or professional engineer to his or her client and to the public for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 16;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 14.